Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1210
Solicitation for purposes of organization; license not required.

For the purposes of organization, and upon issuance of permit by the Department of Insurance, powers of attorney and applications may be solicited without license, but no attorney, agent, or other person, shall make any contracts of indemnity until he shall comply with the provisions of sections 44-1201 to 44-1214.

Laws 1917, c. 189, § 9, p. 462;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XV, § 9, p. 685;

C.S.1922, § 7977;

C.S.1929, § 44-1509;

R.S.1943, § 44-1210.